District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.09

Human Rights Act compliance.

Each franchise agreement shall comply with § 2-1402.67.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 10, 53 DCR 9122

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).